Utah statutes.
79-4-301.   Board of Parks and Recreation -- Creation -- Functions.

(1)  There is created within the department a Board of Parks and Recreation.

(2)  The board is the policy-making body of the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

